Louisiana, session 2026, HB872.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:8(160) and 325.5(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§8. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following words and phrases have the
meaning ascribed to them in this Section, unless the context clearly shows a different
meaning:
* * *
(160) "Automatic identification system" means a very high frequency (VHF)
radio-based tracking system that allows vessels to automatically exchange data, such
as position, speed, and heading, with other vessels, shore stations, and satellites.
* * *
§325.5. Commercial menhaden; harvest reporting; automatic identification system
* * *
D.(1) All vessels engaged in commercial menhaden reduction fishing shall
have installed and utilize an automatic identification system (AIS). This requirement
shall apply to a carrier vessel or steamer, commonly called a mother ship, and to any
purse boat actively engaged in fishing.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 872 ENROLLED
(2) No vessel that is required to utilize an AIS under this Paragraph shall
engage in fishing without a functioning AIS for more than two consecutive business
days. For a group of vessels cooperating on a set as defined in R.S. 56:325.5, the AIS
of at least two vessels shall be functioning at all times while actively engaged in
fishing.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the definitions contained in R.S. 56:8 and to correct any
cross-references to the renumbered Paragraphs if necessary, consistent with the provisions
of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on April 19, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.